zh-TW: 內線及外殼線組內襯類型: 潤滑; 非潤滑; PTFE 內襯; 聚合物塗層; 矽脂內襯; 無內襯; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta obloge kućišta kabela: Podmazano; Nepodmazano; S PTFE oblogom; Obloženo polimerom; S oblogom od silikonske masti; Bez obloge; Ostalo
it: tipo di rivestimento dell'alloggiamento del cavo: Lubrificato; Non lubrificato; Rivestito in PTFE; Rivestito in polimero; Rivestimento in grasso al silicone; Non rivestito; Altro
ko: 케이블 하우징 라이너 유형: 윤활 처리됨; 윤활 처리 안 됨; PTFE 안감; 폴리머 코팅; 실리콘 그리스 라이너; 안감 없음; 기타
sk-SK: Typ vložky káblového puzdra: Premazané; Nepremazané; Vystlané PTFE; Potiahnuté polymérom; Vystlané silikónovým mazivom; Bez výstelky; Iné
sv: Kabelhöljets fodertyp: Smord; Osmord; PTFE-fodrad; Polymerbelagd; Fodrad med silikonfett; Ofodrad; Övrigt
tr: Kablo kılıfı astar tipi: Yağlanmış; Yağlanmamış; PTFE astarlı; Polimer kaplamalı; Silikon gres astar; Astarsız; Diğer
cs: Typ vložky bowdenu kabelu: Promazané; Nepromazané; S vložkou PTFE; Potažené polymerem; Vložka se silikonovým mazivem; Bez vložky; Jiné
vi: Loại lớp lót vỏ cáp: Được bôi trơn; Không bôi trơn; Lót PTFE; Phủ polymer; Lớp lót mỡ silicon; Không có lớp lót; Khác
es: Tipo de revestimiento interno de la funda del cable: Lubricado; No lubricado; Revestido de PTFE; Recubierto de polímero; Revestimiento de grasa de silicona; Sin revestimiento; Otro
ro-RO: Tip de căptușeală pentru carcasă cablului: Lubrifiat; Nelubrifiat; Căptușit cu PTFE; Acoperit cu polimer; Căptușit cu vaselină siliconică; Necăptușit; Altele
de: Typ der Innenbeschichtung der Kabelummantelung: Geschmiert; Ungeschmiert; PTFE-ausgekleidet; Polymerbeschichtet; Silikonfett-Auskleidung; Ohne Auskleidung; Sonstige
hu: Bowdenház belső bélésének típusa: Kenőanyaggal ellátott; Kenőanyag nélküli; PTFE bélésű; Polimer bevonatú; Szilikonzsíros bélésű; Béleletlen; Egyéb
zh-CN: 线管内衬类型: 润滑型; 无润滑型; PTFE 内衬; 聚合物涂层; 硅脂内衬; 无内衬; 其他
fi: Vaijerinkuoren vuorauksen tyyppi: Voideltu; Voitelematon; PTFE-vuorattu; Polymeeripinnoitettu; Silikonirasvavuoraus; Vuoraamaton; Muu
bg-BG: Тип на вътрешната облицовка (лайнер) на кожуха на жилото: Смазан; Несмазан; С PTFE облицовка; С полимерно покритие; Обшивка със силиконова грес; Без облицовка; Други
ru: Тип внутренней вставки оболочки кабеля: Со смазкой; Без смазки; С PTFE-вставкой; С полимерным покрытием; С силиконовой смазкой; Без вставки; Другое
th: ประเภทของซับในปลอกสายเคเบิล: เคลือบสารหล่อลื่น; ไม่เคลือบสารหล่อลื่น; บุ PTFE; เคลือบโพลีเมอร์; บุจาระบีซิลิโคน; ไม่มีการบุภายใน; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de revêtement interne de la gaine de câble: Lubrifié; Non lubrifié; Garni de PTFE; Revêtement en polymère; Garni de graisse de silicone; Non garni; Autre
lt-LT: Kabelio korpuso įdėklo tipas: Suteptas; Nesuteptas; Su PTFE pamušalu; Dengtas polimeru; Silikoniniu tepalu suteptas pamušalas; Be pamušalo; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de revestimento da armação do cabo: Lubrificado; Não lubrificado; Revestido de PTFE; Revestido de polímero; Revestido com graxa de silicone; Sem revestimento; Outro
sl-SI: Tip notranjosti ovoja kabla: Podmazano; Nepodmazano; S podlogo PTFE; S polimernim premazom; Podloga s silikonsko mastjo; Brez podloge; Drugo
el: Τύπος επένδυσης περιβλήματος καλωδίου: Λιπασμένο; Μη λιπασμένο; Επενδεδυμένο με PTFE; Με επικάλυψη πολυμερούς; Επένδυση με γράσο σιλικόνης; Χωρίς επένδυση; Άλλο
nb: Kabelhusforingstype: Smurt; Usmurt; PTFE-fôret; Polymerbelagt; Silikonfettfôr; Ufôret; Annet
en: Cable housing liner type: Lubricated; Non-lubricated; PTFE lined; Polymer coated; Silicone grease liner; Unlined; Other
nl: Buitenkabel voeringtype: Gesmeerd; Ongesmeerd; Met PTFE-voering; Met polymeercoating; Voering met siliconenvet; Ongevoerd; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de revestimento do alojamento de cabos: Lubrificado; Não lubrificado; Forrado a PTFE; Revestido a polímero; Revestimento de massa de silicone; Sem forro; Outro
ja: ケーブルハウジングライナータイプ: 潤滑剤あり; 潤滑剤なし; PTFEライニング; ポリマーコーティング; シリコングリースライナー; ライナーなし; その他
pl: Typ wkładki pancerza linki: Smarowane; Niesmarowane; Z wkładką PTFE; Powlekane polimerem; Z wkładką ze smarem silikonowym; Bez wkładki; Inne
da: Type af inderforing i kabelhylster: Smurt; Ikke-smurt; PTFE-foret; Polymerbelagt; Silikonefedt-foring; Uden foring; Andet